Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 3. Black Hills Joint Power Commission (Compact With South Dakota)

§§ 37-7-301 through 37–7–310.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 207.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 114, § 1, defined the terms for the chapter on the Black Hills joint power commission.

§ 37-7-311.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

Editor's notes.—

This section, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 114, § 1, art. XI; C.S. 1945, § 62-311; W.S. 1957, § 37-130, related to records and annual reports of Black Hills Joint Commission.